Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 1. General Provisions.
The 2001 amendment by c. 663 substituted “have been used” for “has been used” in subdivision A 18, added present subdivision A 21, and made related changes.

The 2001 amendment by c. 859 added present subdivision A 22 and made minor punctuation and related changes.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 66 and 71 are virtually identical, and added subdivision A 23, and made minor stylistic and related changes.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 125, in subsection F, inserted “marriage and family therapist,” deleted “or licensed” following “social worker,” and inserted “duly licensed marriage and family therapist” in the first sentence and inserted “licensed marriage and family therapists” near the beginning in the last sentence; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2004 amendment by c. 246 substituted “Centers for Medicare & Medicaid Services (CMS)” for “Health Care Financing Administration” in subdivision A 17; added subdivision A 24; substituted “subdivision” for “subsection” in subsection J; and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2004 amendment by c. 855 inserted “or nurse practitioner” in subdivision A 14; inserted “nurse practitioner” in subdivision A 21; substituted “that” for “which” in the last sentence of the second paragraph in subsection C; substituted “who” for “which” in subdivision D 3; and substituted “subdivision” for “subsection” in subsection J.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 396 inserted “physician assistant” in subdivision A 14 and in the last sentence of subdivision A 21.

The 2006 amendment by c. 425 rewrote subdivision A 24.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 536 added subdivision H 3.

The 2007 amendments by cc. 873 and 916 are identical, and substituted “2.2-4007.05” for “2.2-4007” in subdivision B 4.

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendments by cc. 813 and 840 are identical, and substituted “Department of Behavioral Health and Developmental Services” for “Department of Mental Health, Mental Retardation and Substance Abuse Services” in subdivision H 2.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 305, in subsection D, added the last paragraph; in subdivisions D 3 and D 4, inserted “or elect to terminate an existing agreement or contract” and added the language following “has been convicted of” and made a related change; in subsection E, in the first paragraph, inserted “terminated or,” substituted “pursuant to subsection D, the provider shall be entitled to appeal the decision pursuant to 42 C.F.R. § 1002.213 and to a post-determination or post-denial” for “on the basis of his interest in a convicted professional or other corporation, the Director shall, upon request, conduct a,” deleted “regarding the provider’s participation in the conduct resulting in the conviction” from the end of the first sentence, added the second sentence, and in the second paragraph, added the last sentence.

The 2010 amendment by c. 785, rewrote subdivision D 3, which formerly read: “Refuse to enter into or renew an agreement or contract with any provider who has been convicted of a felony”; rewrote subdivision D 4, which formerly read: “Refuse to enter into or renew an agreement or contract with a provider who is or has been a principal in a professional or other corporation when such corporation has been convicted of a felony”; rewrote the first paragraph of subsection E, which formerly read: “In any case in which a Medicaid agreement or contract is denied to a provider on the basis of his interest in a convicted professional or other corporation, the Director shall, upon request, conduct a hearing in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) regarding the provider’s participation in the conduct resulting in the conviction” and in the second paragraph, deleted the first sentence, which read: “The Director’s decision upon reconsideration shall be consistent with federal and state laws,” inserted “aggravating and mitigating factors including” and added the last sentence.

The 2010 amendment by c. 790 added subdivision D 5.

The section has been set out above as directed by the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 367 substituted “the U.S. Secretary of Health and Human Services” for “the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services” in the first paragraph of subsection A; and added “which shall include . . . federal law and regulations” at the end of subdivision A 9.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 646 and 689 are identical, and added subdivision A 25 and made related changes.

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendments by cc. 196 and 750, effective January 1, 2015, expires January 1, 2020, are identical and inserted subdivision D 6 preceding the last paragraph of subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 106 inserted the clause (i) designation and added clause (ii) in subdivision A 9.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 211 and 219 are identical, added subdivision A 26 and made related changes.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1082 and 1083 are identical, and added subdivision H 4. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

The 2020 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2020 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 44 and 53, effective November 9, 2020, are identical, and in subdivision A 26, added “as defined in §

38.2-3418.16

, regardless of the originating site or whether the patient is accompanied by a health care provider at the time such services are provided” to the end of the first sentence, added the second sentence and added the second paragraph; and deleted subdivision D 6 which read: “[Expired.]”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 245, effective July 1, 2021, added subdivision A 27; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 250, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision A 17, added “regardless of whether the student receiving care has an individualized education program or whether the health care service is included in a student’s individualized education program” at the end of the first sentence, and added the second and third sentence.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 301 and 302, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and added subdivision A 27, which was subsequently renumbered as A 28 at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 269, in the first sentence in clause (v) of subdivision A 28, inserted “or acute”, deleted “chronic” preceding health, and inserted “when there is evidence that the use of remote patient monitoring is likely to prevent readmission of such patient to a hospital or emergency department”; added subdivision A 29; and made stylistic changes.

The 2022 amendment by c. 384 added subdivision A 29 and made stylistic changes. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission, the new paragraph has been redesignated as subdivision A 30.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 790 and 791 are identical, and added subsection K.

Law Review.

For article on paying the medical bills of elderly parents, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. 69 (1984).

For 2006 survey article, “Health Care Law,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 179 (2006).